Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HASTINGS; WATER TREATMENT PLANTS.new text end new text begin $16,600,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Hastings to predesign, design, construct, and equip three water treatment plants and associated water mains to remove per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) from city wells. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end